Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Chapter 90. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 05.90.001.
Racing events.

To the extent that it is consistent with federal law and regulations, a special racing event of limited duration that is conducted according to (b) of this section may be held on a state highway.

The Department of Public Safety, with the concurrence of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, may grant, and for cause cancel, permission to conduct a special racing event as provided in this section on terms and conditions and at times and places the department may determine. If the Department of Public Safety refuses or cancels an applicant’s permission, the applicant may request a hearing. The hearing shall be conducted under the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 192 SLA 1970; am §§ 1, 2 ch 32 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

05.35.010

and

05.35.020

.
Renumbered and reorganized in 1981.

Cross references. —

For state’s immunity from liability for injuries arising out of permitted events, see AS

44.80.070

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in (b), substituted “on terms” for “upon terms” in the first sentence, and rewrote the second sentence, which read, “If an applicant’s permission is refused or cancelled, the applicant may request the Department of Public Safety for a hearing.”

Collateral references. —

27A Am. Jur. 2d, Entertainment and Sports Law, §§ 9-14, 25.

61A C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, § 1644.

Zoning regulation forbidding “racing” or a “race track.” 83 ALR2d 877.

Liability of participant in unauthorized highway race for injury to third person directly caused by other racer. 13 A.L.R.3d 431.

Liability of public authority for injury arising out of automobile race conducted on street or highway. 80 ALR3d 1192.

Automobile or horse race: liability for injury or death of participant in automobile or horse race at public track. 13 ALR4th 623.